Utah statutes.
62A-14-110.   Court, legal, and other costs.

(1)  The office may not be appointed as the guardian or conservator of a person unless the office petitioned for or agreed in advance to the appointment.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the court shall order the ward or the ward's estate to pay for the cost of services rendered under this chapter, including court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(3)  If the office recovers attorneys' fees under Subsection (2), the office shall transmit those fees to the attorneys who represented the ward or the office in connection with the ward's case.

(4)  If a ward is indigent, the office shall provide guardian and conservator services free of charge and shall make reasonable efforts to secure pro bono legal services for the ward.

(5)  Under no circumstances may court costs or attorneys' fees be assessed to the office.

